Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1951
Annual and regular meetings.

(a) A corporation with members shall hold a membership meeting annually at a time stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws.

(b) A corporation with members may hold regular membership meetings at the times stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws.

(c) Annual and regular membership meetings may be held in or out of this state at the place stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws. If no place is stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, annual and regular meetings shall be held at the corporation's principal office. Unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise, members may participate in an annual or regular meeting of the members or conduct the meeting through the use of any means of communication by which all members participating may simultaneously hear each other during the meeting. A member participating in a meeting by this means is deemed to be present at the meeting.

(d) At the annual meeting:

(1) The president and chief financial officer shall report on the activities and financial condition of the corporation; and

(2) The members shall consider and act upon such other matters as may be raised consistent with the notice requirements of section 21-1955 and subsection (b) of section 21-1962.

(e) At regular meetings the members shall consider and act upon such matters as may be raised consistent with (i) the notice requirements of section 21-1955 and (ii) subsection (b) of section 21-1962.

(f) The failure to hold an annual or regular meeting at a time stated in or fixed in accordance with a corporation's bylaws does not affect the validity of any corporate action.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 51.